Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 3, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  The following amounts are allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the
Administrative  Services  Economic Development Fund, to the Oregon Business Development De-
partment, for the following purposes:
(1) [Operations ..........................................$ 15,248,370]
Operations................................. $ 16,970,908
(2) Business, innovation
[and trade ............................................$ 75,400,115]
and trade................................... $ 76,741,709
(3) [Infrastructure .................................... $ 18,570,779]
Infrastructure ........................... $ 18,828,531
(4) Oregon Film and Video Office ....... $ 1,479,463
SECTION 2.
 Section 4, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  There is allocated  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the Administrative
Services  Economic  Development Fund, to the Department of Education, for the State School Fund,
the amount of [ $604,125,973] $638,737,863.
SECTION 3.  Section 5, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  There is allocated  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the Administrative
Services Economic Development  Fund, to the office of the Governor, the amount of [ $4,639,197]
$4,923,010 for expenses of the Regional Solutions Program.
SECTION 4.  Section 6, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) The  Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall establish a process for al-
locating available moneys in the Administrative Services Economic  Development Fund on a quar-
terly basis to fulfill the biennial allocations made by sections 1 to  13 [of this 2023 Act ], chapter 598,
Oregon Laws 2023. The department shall set the quarterly allocations.
(2) If, in  any quarter, the moneys transferred from the State Lottery Fund to the Administrative
Services Economic Development Fund are insufficient to pay for the  quarterly allocations made by
sections 1 to 13 [ of this 2023 Act ], chapter 598,  Oregon Laws 2023,  or any other 2023 Act, prior
to making any other allocations pursuant to sections  1 to 13 [ of this 2023 Act ], chapter 598, Oregon
Laws 2023 , the  department shall satisfy lottery bond debt service obligations in the amount of
[$342,481,317] $336,702,668 for outstanding lottery bonds.
Enrolled House Bill 5203 (HB 5203-A) Page 1
(3) After the lottery bond debt service  obligations described in subsection (2) of this section are
satisfied, if the remaining moneys transferred from the State Lottery Fund  to the Administrative
Services Economic Development Fund are insufficient to pay for the  quarterly allocations made by
sections 1 to 13 [ of this 2023 Act ], chapter 598, Oregon  Laws 2023, the department shall reduce the
quarterly allocations not described in subsection (2) of this section  proportionately in amounts suf-
ficient to accommodate the revenue shortfall.
SECTION 5.  Section 7, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, from the Administrative
Services Economic Development  Fund, to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the
amount of [ $342,481,317] $336,702,668 for the purpose of paying, when due, the principal, interest and
premium, if any, on outstanding lottery bonds, as described  in section 6 [ of this 2023 Act ], chapter
598, Oregon Laws 2023 .
SECTION 6.  Section 9, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  Notwithstanding  and in lieu of the requirement in ORS 461.549 (2) for a percentage-based
transfer of moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, the  amount allocated from the Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Problem Gambling Treatment Fund  is
[$18,329,825] $18,472,837.
SECTION 7.  Section 11, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 11.  Notwithstanding and in  lieu of the allocation described in section 2 (3), chapter 2,
Oregon Laws 2017  (Ballot Measure 99 (2016)), for a percentage-based transfer of moneys with an
annual cap, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, the amount  allocated from the Administrative
Services Economic Development Fund to the Outdoor School Education Fund is [ $56,406,064]
$36,406,064.
SECTION 8.  Section 14, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 14.  There are allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the Veterans’  Ser-
vices Fund, to the Veterans’ Department  of Veterans’ Affairs Dedicated Lottery Fund, the following
amounts for the following purposes:
(1) [Veterans’ Services Program ........... $ 14,192,356]
Veterans’ Services Program ..... $ 14,672,060
(2) County Veterans’ Service
Officers ................................................$ 7,788,605
(3) National Service
Organizations ..................................... $ 541,693
SECTION 9.
 Section 15, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 15.  There  is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the Veterans’ Services
Fund, to the Bureau of  Labor and Industries, the amount of [ $297,187] $316,222 for veterans’ em-
ployment apprenticeship outreach and coordination.
SECTION 10.  Section 21, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 21.  There are allocated to the Department  of Public Safety Standards and Training for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the  Criminal Fine Account, the following amounts for the
following purposes:
(1) Criminal justice training
[and standards operations ................ $ 51,667,438]
and standards operations.......... $ 55,016,548
(2) Public Safety Memorial Fund ........ $ 279,677
SECTION 11.
 Section 24, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 24.  There are allocated to the State Court Facilities and Security Account established un-
der ORS 1.178, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, from the Criminal Fine Account, the fol-
lowing amounts for the following purposes:
(1) State court security
[and emergency preparedness .......... $ 4,493,981]
Enrolled House Bill 5203 (HB 5203-A) Page 2
and emergency preparedness .... $ 4,614,833
(2) Distributions to county court
facilities security accounts ............. $ 3,326,651
SECTION 12.
 Section 27, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 27.  (1)  There is allocated to the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of $40,750,659.
(2) There is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority, for mental health treatment or  for pur-
poses related to alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early  intervention and treatment services, for
the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of $20,375,329.
(3) There is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the  health systems division, for the
biennium beginning July 1,  2023, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of $5,093,832 for
purposes related to alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4) There is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of [ $196,609,572] $190,824,043, for deposit into  the
Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund.
(5) There is allocated to the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020, for  the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of $15,281,497.
SECTION 13.  Section 28, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 28.  Notwithstanding and in lieu of  the percentage-based transfers of moneys described in
ORS 327.001 (4)(c), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  the Department of Education shall dis-
tribute the moneys in the Fund for Student Success established by ORS 327.001 as follows:
(1) $1,087,178,997 to the Student Investment Account established in ORS 327.175;
(2) [$557,396,445] $548,451,330 to the Statewide Education Initiatives Account established in ORS
327.250; and
(3) [$529,782,552] $500,430,284 to the Early Learning Account established in ORS 327.269.
SECTION 14.
This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5203 (HB 5203-A) Page 3